Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 5. Treasurers; Accounts.

§ 22.1-115.
System of accounting; statements of funds available; classification of expenditures.

The State Board, in conjunction with the Auditor of Public Accounts, shall establish and require of each school division a modern system of accounting for all school funds, state and local, and the treasurer or other fiscal agent of each school division shall render each month to the school board a statement of the funds in his hands available for school purposes. The Board shall prescribe the following major classifications for expenditures of school funds: (i) instruction, (ii) administration, attendance and health, (iii) pupil transportation, (iv) operation and maintenance, (v) school food services and other noninstructional operations, (vi) facilities, (vii) debt and fund transfers, (viii) technology, and (ix) contingency reserves.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-143; 1979, c. 630; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 130; 1989, c. 94; 2002, c. 470; 2008, c. 131.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 470 deleted “and” preceding “(vii),” and added “and (viii) contingency reserves” at the end of the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 131 inserted clause (viii), redesignated former clause (viii) as clause (ix), and made related changes.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 27.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County school board is solely responsibility for school consolidation. —

A school board is solely responsible for the decision whether and how to consolidate schools, and a county board of supervisors may not instruct the school board to consolidate schools or how to consolidate schools, but may make a recommendation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry C. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, 10-118,
(12/08/10).

Special school tax. —

Special school tax can only be used to pay for capital expenditures, indebtedness or rent, therefore unspent special school tax funds can only be reappropriated to the school board for such purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to Michelle R. Robl, County Attorney, Prince William County, 20-029, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/14/21).

§ 22.1-116.
How and by whom funds for school division kept and disbursed.

The treasurer or comparable officer of each county, city or part thereof constituting a school division or town, if the town constitutes the school division, shall be charged with the responsibility for the receipt, custody and disbursement of the funds of the school board and shall keep such funds in an account or accounts separate and distinct from all other funds.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-132, 22-133; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1960, c. 222; 1980, c. 559.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 26, 29.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Disbursement of school payroll. —

The authority to establish payroll dates for school division employees rests with the school board, including the establishment of regular payroll periods, but the mechanics of making the payments to schools rest with the treasurer of the locality. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Glenn Oder and The Honorable Marty G. Eubank, Treasurer, City of Newport News, 11-003, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 14 (2/25/11).

This section is satisfied if the treasurer maintains separate internal accounts of the funds of the locality and of the school division for accounting purposes; the treasurer is not required to maintain a separate bank account for school board funds. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Glenn Oder and The Honorable Marty G. Eubank, Treasurer, City of Newport News, 11-003, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 14 (2/25/11).

Special school tax. —

If county board of supervisors votes to levy special school tax, the proceeds of the tax should be managed by the county treasurer in accordance with § 22.2-116. See opinion of Attorney General to Michelle R. Robl, County Attorney, Prince William County, 20-029, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/14/21).

§ 22.1-116.1.
Receipt of payment by credit cards; service charge.

School boards may accept payment for services and goods by credit or debit cards. School boards accepting credit or debit card payments may, in addition to any penalties and interest, add to such payment a sum as a service charge for the acceptance of such method of payment.

History.

2002, cc. 164, 238.

§ 22.1-117.
Fiscal agents of certain school divisions.

The fiscal agent for the school board of a school division composed of part or all of more than one county or city shall be the treasurer of one of the participating counties or cities, as agreed upon by the division school board and the governing bodies. In the event agreement on the selection of a fiscal agent cannot be reached, the Board of Education shall designate such fiscal agent. For his services as fiscal agent, the treasurer shall be paid such salary as the school board and treasurer may agree upon. In the event the school board and the treasurer so designated cannot agree on such compensation, the amount of salary to be paid shall be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. The amount so fixed by the court shall be binding upon both the treasurer and the school board. Nothing contained in this section shall affect the regular salary or expense allowance of the treasurer as fixed annually by the State Compensation Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-100.10; 1954, c. 391; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-118.
Management of funds for joint school; county or city treasurer as fiscal agent.

The treasurer of a county or city in which a joint school is located shall be the fiscal agent of such school and shall receive and disburse the funds thereof. However, the participating school boards of a joint school, including an academic year Governor’s School operated by two or more school divisions, may by agreement and with the approval of the respective local governing bodies, select the fiscal agent for the joint school from among the treasurers, as defined in §

58.1-3123

, of the participating localities. All disbursements shall be by warrant signed by the clerk of the committee for control of such school and countersigned by such treasurer as fiscal agent.

For his services as fiscal agent, the treasurer shall be paid such salary as may be agreed upon by the committee for control of the joint school and treasurer. In the event they cannot agree, then the amount of salary to be paid shall be submitted to the circuit court of the county or city in which the school is located for hearing and determination, and the amount so fixed by the court shall be binding upon both the treasurer and the committee. Nothing contained in this section shall affect the regular salary allowance of the treasurer as fixed annually by the State Compensation Board.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the property and school known as New London Academy leased under the provisions of Chapter 174 of the Acts of Assembly of 1887, approved May 10, 1887, and acts amendatory thereof, nor shall they apply in Albemarle County.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-133.1; 1970, c. 215; 1980, c. 559; 1993, cc. 7, 161; 2003, c. 702; 2007, cc. 45, 813.

Cross references.

For statute authorizing establishment of joint schools, see § 22.1-26.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 702 added the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 45, effective February 19, 2007, transferred provisions relating to Governor’s schools in the former last paragraph to the second sentence in the first paragraph and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Albemarle County” for “any county having a population of more than 30,900 but less than 31,000” at the end of the third paragraph.

§ 22.1-119.
No commission for treasurer.

No treasurer shall receive any commission upon any money loaned from the Literary Fund, upon donations by individuals or foundations, upon funds from insurance on any school building destroyed by fire, upon money derived from the sale of school property or upon funds derived from loans or bond issues.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-134; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-120.
Settlement by treasurer.

Treasurers or other fiscal agents shall settle with school boards for the school funds as of June thirtieth of each year not later than August fifteenth of each year.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-135; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-121.
Proceedings against officers, etc., to compel settlement of accounts.

The school board shall have the power and duty, in the event of any delinquency or any irregularity in the acts of any treasurer, officer, agent or employee handling school funds or of any member of such school board, to take such steps and institute such legal proceedings as may be necessary and proper in order to secure complete settlement of the accounts of such treasurer, officer, agent, employee or member of such school board and a full and clear exhibit of the transactions of such treasurer, officer, agent, employee or member of such school board in connection with the receipts and disbursements of any funds for public school purposes and to compel the payment of any balances that may be in the hands of such treasurer or other person. The school board shall have the power and duty to take such steps and institute such legal proceedings as may be necessary and proper to secure a complete settlement of the accounts of any trustees to whom any funds or other property for the purposes of public school education shall have been entrusted and to secure a full and proper administration of such trusts; and to this end it may institute suit for the removal, for good cause shown, of such trustee or trustees and for the appointment of new trustees either to replace those removed or to fill vacancies and may institute such suits or actions as may be necessary to compel the payment of any balances in the hands of the old trustee or trustees so removed or to correct any defect or irregularity whatever in the administration of such trust fund or other property.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-136; 1980, c. 559.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Preliminary injunctive and mandamus relief was not warranted. —

School board’s request for a preliminary injunction and mandamus relief was denied where the fiscal year was winding down, the city had promised to provide the full complement of funding under the school board’s appropriation by the end of the fiscal year, and the board would have a remedy under § 22.1-121 at the end of the fiscal year. Sch. Bd. of Richmond v. Wilder, 73 Va. Cir. 251, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 56 (Richmond Apr. 6, 2007).

School board has right to bring legal proceedings. —

County did not have a cause of action against school officials and a school board based on any alleged action under the statutory scheme being malfeasance in office because the statutory scheme gave the school board the right to bring legal proceedings to challenge any irregularity in the acts of an officer or employee but gave no such right to the county. Cty. of Lancaster v. Latimore, 97 Va. Cir. 401, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 228 (Lancaster County May 31, 2013).